South Dakota, session 2026, HB1254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-45:
There are specifically exempted from the provisions of this chapter and from the
computation of the amount of tax imposed by it, the gross receipts from the sale of any
soil amendment, as defined in § 38-19A-1, provided five hundred pounds or more of any
one of these products is sold in a single sale to be used exclusively for agricultural
purposes.

26.809.37 2 1254
An Act to exempt any soil amendment used exclusively for agricultural purposes from sales
tax.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1254
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1254 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1254 ENROLLED